Illinois, session 104th, SB1922.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 6-206 and 11-907 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-206)7    Sec. 6-206. Discretionary authority to suspend or revoke 8license or permit; right to a hearing.9    (a) The Secretary of State is authorized to suspend or 10revoke the driving privileges of any person without 11preliminary hearing upon a showing of the person's records or 12other sufficient evidence that the person:13        1. Has committed an offense for which mandatory 14    revocation of a driver's license or permit is required 15    upon conviction;16        2. Has been convicted of not less than 3 offenses 17    against traffic regulations governing the movement of 18    vehicles committed within any 12-month period. No 19    revocation or suspension shall be entered more than 6 20    months after the date of last conviction;21        3. Has been repeatedly involved as a driver in motor 22    vehicle collisions or has been repeatedly convicted of 23    offenses against laws and ordinances regulating the   SB1922 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1    movement of traffic, to a degree that indicates lack of 2    ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable care in the 3    safe operation of a motor vehicle or disrespect for the 4    traffic laws and the safety of other persons upon the 5    highway;6        4. Has by the unlawful operation of a motor vehicle 7    caused or contributed to a crash resulting in injury 8    requiring immediate professional treatment in a medical 9    facility or doctor's office to any person, except that any 10    suspension or revocation imposed by the Secretary of State 11    under the provisions of this subsection shall start no 12    later than 6 months after being convicted of violating a 13    law or ordinance regulating the movement of traffic, which 14    violation is related to the crash, or shall start not more 15    than one year after the date of the crash, whichever date 16    occurs later;17        5. Has permitted an unlawful or fraudulent use of a 18    driver's license, identification card, or permit;19        6. Has been lawfully convicted of an offense or 20    offenses in another state, including the authorization 21    contained in Section 6-203.1, which if committed within 22    this State would be grounds for suspension or revocation;23        7. Has refused or failed to submit to an examination 24    provided for by Section 6-207 or has failed to pass the 25    examination;26        8. Is ineligible for a driver's license or permit   SB1922 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1    under the provisions of Section 6-103;2        9. Has made a false statement or knowingly concealed a 3    material fact or has used false information or 4    identification in any application for a license, 5    identification card, or permit;6        10. Has possessed, displayed, or attempted to 7    fraudulently use any license, identification card, or 8    permit not issued to the person;9        11. Has operated a motor vehicle upon a highway of 10    this State when the person's driving privilege or 11    privilege to obtain a driver's license or permit was 12    revoked or suspended unless the operation was authorized 13    by a monitoring device driving permit, judicial driving 14    permit issued prior to January 1, 2009, probationary 15    license to drive, or restricted driving permit issued 16    under this Code;17        12. Has submitted to any portion of the application 18    process for another person or has obtained the services of 19    another person to submit to any portion of the application 20    process for the purpose of obtaining a license, 21    identification card, or permit for some other person;22        13. Has operated a motor vehicle upon a highway of 23    this State when the person's driver's license or permit 24    was invalid under the provisions of Sections 6-107.1 and 25    6-110;26        14. Has committed a violation of Section 6-301,   SB1922 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1    6-301.1, or 6-301.2 of this Code, or Section 14, 14A, or 2    14B of the Illinois Identification Card Act or a similar 3    offense in another state if, at the time of the offense, 4    the person held an Illinois driver's license or 5    identification card;6        15. Has been convicted of violating Section 21-2 of 7    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 8    relating to criminal trespass to vehicles if the person 9    exercised actual physical control over the vehicle during 10    the commission of the offense, in which case the 11    suspension shall be for one year;12        16. Has been convicted of violating Section 11-204 of 13    this Code relating to fleeing from a peace officer;14        17. Has refused to submit to a test, or tests, as 15    required under Section 11-501.1 of this Code and the 16    person has not sought a hearing as provided for in Section 17    11-501.1;18        18. (Blank);19        19. Has committed a violation of paragraph (a) or (b) 20    of Section 6-101 relating to driving without a driver's 21    license;22        20. Has been convicted of violating Section 6-104 23    relating to classification of driver's license;24        21. Has been convicted of violating Section 11-402 of 25    this Code relating to leaving the scene of a crash 26    resulting in damage to a vehicle in excess of $1,000, in   SB1922 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1    which case the suspension shall be for one year;2        22. Has used a motor vehicle in violating paragraph 3    (3), (4), (7), or (9) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of 4    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 5    relating to unlawful possession of weapons, in which case 6    the suspension shall be for one year;7        23. Has, as a driver, been convicted of committing a 8    violation of paragraph (a) of Section 11-502 of this Code 9    for a second or subsequent time within one year of a 10    similar violation;11        24. Has been convicted by a court-martial or punished 12    by non-judicial punishment by military authorities of the 13    United States at a military installation in Illinois or in 14    another state of or for a traffic-related offense that is 15    the same as or similar to an offense specified under 16    Section 6-205 or 6-206 of this Code;17        25. Has permitted any form of identification to be 18    used by another in the application process in order to 19    obtain or attempt to obtain a license, identification 20    card, or permit;21        26. Has altered or attempted to alter a license or has 22    possessed an altered license, identification card, or 23    permit;24        27. (Blank);25        28. Has been convicted for a first time of the illegal 26    possession, while operating or in actual physical control,   SB1922 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1    as a driver, of a motor vehicle, of any controlled 2    substance prohibited under the Illinois Controlled 3    Substances Act, any cannabis prohibited under the Cannabis 4    Control Act, or any methamphetamine prohibited under the 5    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, in 6    which case the person's driving privileges shall be 7    suspended for one year. Any defendant found guilty of this 8    offense while operating a motor vehicle shall have an 9    entry made in the court record by the presiding judge that 10    this offense did occur while the defendant was operating a 11    motor vehicle and order the clerk of the court to report 12    the violation to the Secretary of State;13        29. Has been convicted of the following offenses that 14    were committed while the person was operating or in actual 15    physical control, as a driver, of a motor vehicle: 16    criminal sexual assault, predatory criminal sexual assault 17    of a child, aggravated criminal sexual assault, criminal 18    sexual abuse, aggravated criminal sexual abuse, juvenile 19    pimping, soliciting for a juvenile prostitute, promoting 20    juvenile prostitution as described in subdivision (a)(1), 21    (a)(2), or (a)(3) of Section 11-14.4 of the Criminal Code 22    of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, and the manufacture, 23    sale or delivery of controlled substances or instruments 24    used for illegal drug use or abuse in which case the 25    driver's driving privileges shall be suspended for one 26    year;  SB1922 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1        30. Has been convicted a second or subsequent time for 2    any combination of the offenses named in paragraph 29 of 3    this subsection, in which case the person's driving 4    privileges shall be suspended for 5 years;5        31. Has refused to submit to a test as required by 6    Section 11-501.6 of this Code or Section 5-16c of the Boat 7    Registration and Safety Act or has submitted to a test 8    resulting in an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more or 9    any amount of a drug, substance, or compound resulting 10    from the unlawful use or consumption of cannabis as listed 11    in the Cannabis Control Act, a controlled substance as 12    listed in the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, an 13    intoxicating compound as listed in the Use of Intoxicating 14    Compounds Act, or methamphetamine as listed in the 15    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, in 16    which case the penalty shall be as prescribed in Section 17    6-208.1;18        32. Has been convicted of Section 24-1.2 of the 19    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 20    relating to the aggravated discharge of a firearm if the 21    offender was located in a motor vehicle at the time the 22    firearm was discharged, in which case the suspension shall 23    be for 3 years;24        33. Has as a driver, who was less than 21 years of age 25    on the date of the offense, been convicted a first time of 26    a violation of paragraph (a) of Section 11-502 of this   SB1922 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1    Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance;2        34. Has committed a violation of Section 11-1301.5 of 3    this Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance;4        35. Has committed a violation of Section 11-1301.6 of 5    this Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance;6        36. Is under the age of 21 years at the time of arrest 7    and has been convicted of not less than 2 offenses against 8    traffic regulations governing the movement of vehicles 9    committed within any 24-month period. No revocation or 10    suspension shall be entered more than 6 months after the 11    date of last conviction;12        37. Has committed a violation of subsection (c), 13    (c-5), or (c-10) of Section 11-907 of this Code that 14    resulted in damage to the property of another or the death 15    or injury of another;16        38. Has been convicted of a violation of Section 6-20 17    of the Liquor Control Act of 1934 or a similar provision of 18    a local ordinance and the person was an occupant of a motor 19    vehicle at the time of the violation;20        39. Has committed a second or subsequent violation of 21    Section 11-1201 of this Code;22        40. Has committed a violation of subsection (a-1) of 23    Section 11-908 of this Code;24        41. Has committed a second or subsequent violation of 25    Section 11-605.1 of this Code, a similar provision of a 26    local ordinance, or a similar violation in any other state   SB1922 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1    within 2 years of the date of the previous violation, in 2    which case the suspension shall be for 90 days;3        42. Has committed a violation of subsection (a-1) of 4    Section 11-1301.3 of this Code or a similar provision of a 5    local ordinance; 6        43. Has received a disposition of court supervision 7    for a violation of subsection (a), (d), or (e) of Section 8    6-20 of the Liquor Control Act of 1934 or a similar 9    provision of a local ordinance and the person was an 10    occupant of a motor vehicle at the time of the violation, 11    in which case the suspension shall be for a period of 3 12    months; 13        44. Is under the age of 21 years at the time of arrest 14    and has been convicted of an offense against traffic 15    regulations governing the movement of vehicles after 16    having previously had his or her driving privileges 17    suspended or revoked pursuant to subparagraph 36 of this 18    Section;19        45. Has, in connection with or during the course of a 20    formal hearing conducted under Section 2-118 of this Code: 21    (i) committed perjury; (ii) submitted fraudulent or 22    falsified documents; (iii) submitted documents that have 23    been materially altered; or (iv) submitted, as his or her 24    own, documents that were in fact prepared or composed for 25    another person;26        46. Has committed a violation of subsection (j) of   SB1922 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1    Section 3-413 of this Code;2        47. Has committed a violation of subsection (a) of 3    Section 11-502.1 of this Code; 4        48. Has submitted a falsified or altered medical 5    examiner's certificate to the Secretary of State or 6    provided false information to obtain a medical examiner's 7    certificate; 8        49. Has been convicted of a violation of Section 9    11-1002 or 11-1002.5 that resulted in a Type A injury to 10    another, in which case the driving privileges of the 11    person shall be suspended for 12 months; 12        50. Has committed a violation of subsection (b-5) of 13    Section 12-610.2 that resulted in great bodily harm, 14    permanent disability, or disfigurement, in which case the 15    driving privileges of the person shall be suspended for 12 16    months;17        51. Has committed a violation of Section 10-15 Of the 18    Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or a similar provision of 19    a local ordinance while in a motor vehicle; or20        52. Has committed a violation of subsection (b) of 21    Section 10-20 of the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or a 22    similar provision of a local ordinance.23    For purposes of paragraphs 5, 9, 10, 12, 14, 19, 25, 26, 24and 27 of this subsection, license means any driver's license, 25any traffic ticket issued when the person's driver's license 26is deposited in lieu of bail, a suspension notice issued by the   SB1922 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1Secretary of State, a duplicate or corrected driver's license, 2a probationary driver's license, or a temporary driver's 3license.4    (b) If any conviction forming the basis of a suspension or 5revocation authorized under this Section is appealed, the 6Secretary of State may rescind or withhold the entry of the 7order of suspension or revocation, as the case may be, 8provided that a certified copy of a stay order of a court is 9filed with the Secretary of State. If the conviction is 10affirmed on appeal, the date of the conviction shall relate 11back to the time the original judgment of conviction was 12entered and the 6-month limitation prescribed shall not apply.13    (c) 1. Upon suspending or revoking the driver's license or 14permit of any person as authorized in this Section, the 15Secretary of State shall immediately notify the person in 16writing of the revocation or suspension. The notice to be 17deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, to the 18last known address of the person.19    2. If the Secretary of State suspends the driver's license 20of a person under subsection 2 of paragraph (a) of this 21Section, a person's privilege to operate a vehicle as an 22occupation shall not be suspended, provided an affidavit is 23properly completed, the appropriate fee received, and a permit 24issued prior to the effective date of the suspension, unless 5 25offenses were committed, at least 2 of which occurred while 26operating a commercial vehicle in connection with the driver's   SB1922 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1regular occupation. All other driving privileges shall be 2suspended by the Secretary of State. Any driver prior to 3operating a vehicle for occupational purposes only must submit 4the affidavit on forms to be provided by the Secretary of State 5setting forth the facts of the person's occupation. The 6affidavit shall also state the number of offenses committed 7while operating a vehicle in connection with the driver's 8regular occupation. The affidavit shall be accompanied by the 9driver's license. Upon receipt of a properly completed 10affidavit, the Secretary of State shall issue the driver a 11permit to operate a vehicle in connection with the driver's 12regular occupation only. Unless the permit is issued by the 13Secretary of State prior to the date of suspension, the 14privilege to drive any motor vehicle shall be suspended as set 15forth in the notice that was mailed under this Section. If an 16affidavit is received subsequent to the effective date of this 17suspension, a permit may be issued for the remainder of the 18suspension period.19    The provisions of this subparagraph shall not apply to any 20driver required to possess a CDL for the purpose of operating a 21commercial motor vehicle.22    Any person who falsely states any fact in the affidavit 23required herein shall be guilty of perjury under Section 6-302 24and upon conviction thereof shall have all driving privileges 25revoked without further rights.26    3. At the conclusion of a hearing under Section 2-118 of   SB1922 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1this Code, the Secretary of State shall either rescind or 2continue an order of revocation or shall substitute an order 3of suspension; or, good cause appearing therefor, rescind, 4continue, change, or extend the order of suspension. If the 5Secretary of State does not rescind the order, the Secretary 6may upon application, to relieve undue hardship (as defined by 7the rules of the Secretary of State), issue a restricted 8driving permit granting the privilege of driving a motor 9vehicle between the petitioner's residence and petitioner's 10place of employment or within the scope of the petitioner's 11employment-related duties, or to allow the petitioner to 12transport himself or herself, or a family member of the 13petitioner's household to a medical facility, to receive 14necessary medical care, to allow the petitioner to transport 15himself or herself to and from alcohol or drug remedial or 16rehabilitative activity recommended by a licensed service 17provider, or to allow the petitioner to transport himself or 18herself or a family member of the petitioner's household to 19classes, as a student, at an accredited educational 20institution, or to allow the petitioner to transport children, 21elderly persons, or persons with disabilities who do not hold 22driving privileges and are living in the petitioner's 23household to and from daycare. The petitioner must demonstrate 24that no alternative means of transportation is reasonably 25available and that the petitioner will not endanger the public 26safety or welfare.  SB1922 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1        (A) If a person's license or permit is revoked or 2    suspended due to 2 or more convictions of violating 3    Section 11-501 of this Code or a similar provision of a 4    local ordinance or a similar out-of-state offense, or 5    Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 6    Code of 2012, where the use of alcohol or other drugs is 7    recited as an element of the offense, or a similar 8    out-of-state offense, or a combination of these offenses, 9    arising out of separate occurrences, that person, if 10    issued a restricted driving permit, may not operate a 11    vehicle unless it has been equipped with an ignition 12    interlock device as defined in Section 1-129.1.13        (B) If a person's license or permit is revoked or 14    suspended 2 or more times due to any combination of:15            (i) a single conviction of violating Section 16        11-501 of this Code or a similar provision of a local 17        ordinance or a similar out-of-state offense or Section 18        9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 19        of 2012, where the use of alcohol or other drugs is 20        recited as an element of the offense, or a similar 21        out-of-state offense; or22            (ii) a statutory summary suspension or revocation 23        under Section 11-501.1; or24            (iii) a suspension under Section 6-203.1; 25    arising out of separate occurrences; that person, if 26    issued a restricted driving permit, may not operate a   SB1922 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1    vehicle unless it has been equipped with an ignition 2    interlock device as defined in Section 1-129.1.3        (B-5) If a person's license or permit is revoked or 4    suspended due to a conviction for a violation of 5    subparagraph (C) or (F) of paragraph (1) of subsection (d) 6    of Section 11-501 of this Code, or a similar provision of a 7    local ordinance or similar out-of-state offense, that 8    person, if issued a restricted driving permit, may not 9    operate a vehicle unless it has been equipped with an 10    ignition interlock device as defined in Section 1-129.1. 11        (C) The person issued a permit conditioned upon the 12    use of an ignition interlock device must pay to the 13    Secretary of State DUI Administration Fund an amount not 14    to exceed $30 per month. The Secretary shall establish by 15    rule the amount and the procedures, terms, and conditions 16    relating to these fees.17        (D) If the restricted driving permit is issued for 18    employment purposes, then the prohibition against 19    operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an 20    ignition interlock device does not apply to the operation 21    of an occupational vehicle owned or leased by that 22    person's employer when used solely for employment 23    purposes. For any person who, within a 5-year period, is 24    convicted of a second or subsequent offense under Section 25    11-501 of this Code, or a similar provision of a local 26    ordinance or similar out-of-state offense, this employment   SB1922 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1    exemption does not apply until either a one-year period 2    has elapsed during which that person had his or her 3    driving privileges revoked or a one-year period has 4    elapsed during which that person had a restricted driving 5    permit which required the use of an ignition interlock 6    device on every motor vehicle owned or operated by that 7    person.8        (E) In each case the Secretary may issue a restricted 9    driving permit for a period deemed appropriate, except 10    that all permits shall expire no later than 2 years from 11    the date of issuance. A restricted driving permit issued 12    under this Section shall be subject to cancellation, 13    revocation, and suspension by the Secretary of State in 14    like manner and for like cause as a driver's license 15    issued under this Code may be cancelled, revoked, or 16    suspended; except that a conviction upon one or more 17    offenses against laws or ordinances regulating the 18    movement of traffic shall be deemed sufficient cause for 19    the revocation, suspension, or cancellation of a 20    restricted driving permit. The Secretary of State may, as 21    a condition to the issuance of a restricted driving 22    permit, require the applicant to participate in a 23    designated driver remedial or rehabilitative program. The 24    Secretary of State is authorized to cancel a restricted 25    driving permit if the permit holder does not successfully 26    complete the program.  SB1922 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1        (F) A person subject to the provisions of paragraph 4 2    of subsection (b) of Section 6-208 of this Code may make 3    application for a restricted driving permit at a hearing 4    conducted under Section 2-118 of this Code after the 5    expiration of 5 years from the effective date of the most 6    recent revocation or after 5 years from the date of 7    release from a period of imprisonment resulting from a 8    conviction of the most recent offense, whichever is later, 9    provided the person, in addition to all other requirements 10    of the Secretary, shows by clear and convincing evidence: 11            (i) a minimum of 3 years of uninterrupted 12        abstinence from alcohol and the unlawful use or 13        consumption of cannabis under the Cannabis Control 14        Act, a controlled substance under the Illinois 15        Controlled Substances Act, an intoxicating compound 16        under the Use of Intoxicating Compounds Act, or 17        methamphetamine under the Methamphetamine Control and 18        Community Protection Act; and19            (ii) the successful completion of any 20        rehabilitative treatment and involvement in any 21        ongoing rehabilitative activity that may be 22        recommended by a properly licensed service provider 23        according to an assessment of the person's alcohol or 24        drug use under Section 11-501.01 of this Code. 25        In determining whether an applicant is eligible for a 26    restricted driving permit under this subparagraph (F), the   SB1922 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1    Secretary may consider any relevant evidence, including, 2    but not limited to, testimony, affidavits, records, and 3    the results of regular alcohol or drug tests. Persons 4    subject to the provisions of paragraph 4 of subsection (b) 5    of Section 6-208 of this Code and who have been convicted 6    of more than one violation of paragraph (3), paragraph 7    (4), or paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Section 11-501 8    of this Code shall not be eligible to apply for a 9    restricted driving permit under this subparagraph (F). 10        A restricted driving permit issued under this 11    subparagraph (F) shall provide that the holder may only 12    operate motor vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock 13    device as required under paragraph (2) of subsection (c) 14    of Section 6-205 of this Code and subparagraph (A) of 15    paragraph 3 of subsection (c) of this Section. The 16    Secretary may revoke a restricted driving permit or amend 17    the conditions of a restricted driving permit issued under 18    this subparagraph (F) if the holder operates a vehicle 19    that is not equipped with an ignition interlock device, or 20    for any other reason authorized under this Code. 21        A restricted driving permit issued under this 22    subparagraph (F) shall be revoked, and the holder barred 23    from applying for or being issued a restricted driving 24    permit in the future, if the holder is convicted of a 25    violation of Section 11-501 of this Code, a similar 26    provision of a local ordinance, or a similar offense in   SB1922 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1    another state. 2    (c-3) In the case of a suspension under paragraph 43 of 3subsection (a), reports received by the Secretary of State 4under this Section shall, except during the actual time the 5suspension is in effect, be privileged information and for use 6only by the courts, police officers, prosecuting authorities, 7the driver licensing administrator of any other state, the 8Secretary of State, or the parent or legal guardian of a driver 9under the age of 18. However, beginning January 1, 2008, if the 10person is a CDL holder, the suspension shall also be made 11available to the driver licensing administrator of any other 12state, the U.S. Department of Transportation, and the affected 13driver or motor carrier or prospective motor carrier upon 14request. 15    (c-4) In the case of a suspension under paragraph 43 of 16subsection (a), the Secretary of State shall notify the person 17by mail that his or her driving privileges and driver's 18license will be suspended one month after the date of the 19mailing of the notice. 20    (c-5) The Secretary of State may, as a condition of the 21reissuance of a driver's license or permit to an applicant 22whose driver's license or permit has been suspended before he 23or she reached the age of 21 years pursuant to any of the 24provisions of this Section, require the applicant to 25participate in a driver remedial education course and be 26retested under Section 6-109 of this Code.  SB1922 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1    (d) This Section is subject to the provisions of the 2Driver License Compact.3    (e) The Secretary of State shall not issue a restricted 4driving permit to a person under the age of 16 years whose 5driving privileges have been suspended or revoked under any 6provisions of this Code.7    (f) In accordance with 49 CFR 384, the Secretary of State 8may not issue a restricted driving permit for the operation of 9a commercial motor vehicle to a person holding a CDL whose 10driving privileges have been suspended, revoked, cancelled, or 11disqualified under any provisions of this Code.12(Source: P.A. 102-299, eff. 8-6-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 13102-749, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-982, eff. 147-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-822, eff. 1-1-25.) 15    (625 ILCS 5/11-907)16    Sec. 11-907. Operation of vehicles and streetcars on 17approach of authorized emergency vehicles.18    (a) Upon the immediate approach of an authorized emergency 19vehicle making use of audible and visual signals meeting the 20requirements of this Code or a police vehicle properly and 21lawfully making use of an audible or visual signal:22        (1) the driver of every other vehicle shall yield the 23    right-of-way and shall immediately drive to a position 24    parallel to, and as close as possible to, the right-hand 25    edge or curb of the highway clear of any intersection and   SB1922 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1    shall, if necessary to permit the safe passage of the 2    emergency vehicle, stop and remain in such position until 3    the authorized emergency vehicle has passed, unless 4    otherwise directed by a police officer; and5        (2) the operator of every streetcar shall immediately 6    stop such car clear of any intersection and keep it in such 7    position until the authorized emergency vehicle has 8    passed, unless otherwise directed by a police officer.9    (b) This Section shall not operate to relieve the driver 10of an authorized emergency vehicle from the duty to drive with 11due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway.12    (c) Upon approaching a stationary authorized emergency 13vehicle or emergency scene, when the stationary authorized 14emergency vehicle is giving a visual signal by displaying 15oscillating, rotating, or flashing lights as authorized under 16Section 12-215 of this Code, a person who drives an 17approaching vehicle shall:18        (1) proceeding with due caution, yield the 19    right-of-way by making a lane change into a lane not 20    adjacent to that of the authorized emergency vehicle, if 21    possible with due regard to safety and traffic conditions, 22    if on a highway having at least 4 lanes with not less than 23    2 lanes proceeding in the same direction as the 24    approaching vehicle and reduce the speed of the vehicle to 25    a speed that is reasonable and proper with regard to 26    traffic conditions and the use of the highway to avoid a   SB1922 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1    collision and leaving a safe distance until safely past 2    the stationary emergency vehicle; or3        (2) if changing lanes would be impossible or unsafe, 4    proceeding with due caution, reduce the speed of the 5    vehicle to a speed that is reasonable and proper with 6    regard to traffic conditions and the use of the highway to 7    avoid a collision, maintaining a safe speed for road 8    conditions and leaving a safe distance until safely past 9    the stationary emergency vehicles.10    The visual signal specified under this subsection (c) 11given by a stationary authorized emergency vehicle is an 12indication to drivers of approaching vehicles that a hazardous 13condition is present when circumstances are not immediately 14clear. Drivers of vehicles approaching a stationary authorized 15emergency vehicle in any lane shall heed the warning of the 16signal, reduce the speed of the vehicle, proceed with due 17caution, maintain a safe speed for road conditions, be 18prepared to stop, and leave a safe distance until safely 19passed the stationary emergency vehicle. 20    As used in this subsection (c) and subsection (c-5), 21"authorized emergency vehicle" includes any vehicle authorized 22by law to be equipped with oscillating, rotating, or flashing 23lights under Section 12-215 of this Code, while the owner or 24operator of the vehicle is engaged in his or her official 25duties. As used in this subsection (c) and subsection (c-10), 26"emergency scene" means a location where a stationary   SB1922 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1authorized emergency vehicle as defined by herein is present 2and has activated its oscillating, rotating, or flashing 3lights. 4    (c-5) The driver of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way 5to any authorized emergency vehicle obviously and actually 6engaged in work upon a highway, whether stationary or not, and 7displaying flashing lights as provided in Section 12-215 of 8this Act.9    (c-10) The driver of a vehicle shall yield the 10right-of-way to an emergency worker obviously and actually 11engaged in work upon a highway at an emergency scene. The 12driver of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to any 13pedestrian upon a highway directly involved in the emergency 14scene. 15    (d) A person who violates subsection (c), (c-5), or 16(c-10), of this Section commits a business offense punishable 17by a fine of not less than $250 or more than $10,000 for a 18first violation, and a fine of not less than $750 or more than 19$10,000 for a second or subsequent violation. It is a factor in 20aggravation if the person committed the offense while in 21violation of Section 11-501, 12-610.1, or 12-610.2 of this 22Code. Imposition of the penalties authorized by this 23subsection (d) for a violation of subsection (c) of this 24Section that results in the death of another person does not 25preclude imposition of appropriate additional civil or 26criminal penalties. A person who violates subsection (c) and   SB1922 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1the violation results in damage to another vehicle commits a 2Class A misdemeanor. A person who violates subsection (c) and 3the violation results in the injury or death of another person 4commits a Class 4 felony.5    (e) If a violation of subsection (c), (c-5), or (c-10), of 6this Section results in damage to the property of another 7person, in addition to any other penalty imposed, the person's 8driving privileges shall be suspended for a fixed period of 9not less than 90 days and not more than one year.10    (f) If a violation of subsection (c), (c-5), or (c-10), of 11this Section results in injury to another person, in addition 12to any other penalty imposed, the person's driving privileges 13shall be suspended for a fixed period of not less than 180 days 14and not more than 2 years.15    (g) If a violation of subsection (c), (c-5), or(c-10), of 16this Section results in the death of another person, in 17addition to any other penalty imposed, the person's driving 18privileges shall be suspended for 2 years.19    (h) The Secretary of State shall, upon receiving a record 20of a judgment entered against a person under subsection (c), 21(c-5), or (c-10), of this Section:22        (1) suspend the person's driving privileges for the 23    mandatory period; or24        (2) extend the period of an existing suspension by the 25    appropriate mandatory period.26    (i) The Scott's Law Fund shall be a special fund in the   SB1922 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1State treasury. Subject to appropriation by the General 2Assembly and approval by the Director, the Director of the 3State Police shall use all moneys in the Scott's Law Fund in 4the Department's discretion to fund the production of 5materials to educate drivers on approaching stationary 6authorized emergency vehicles, to hire off-duty Illinois State 7Police for enforcement of this Section, and for other law 8enforcement purposes the Director deems necessary in these 9efforts.10    (j) For violations of this Section issued by a county or 11municipal police officer, the assessment shall be deposited 12into the county's or municipality's Transportation Safety 13Highway Hire-back Fund. The county shall use the moneys in its 14Transportation Safety Highway Hire-back Fund to hire off-duty 15county police officers to monitor construction or maintenance 16zones in that county on highways other than interstate 17highways. The county, in its discretion, may also use a 18portion of the moneys in its Transportation Safety Highway 19Hire-back Fund to purchase equipment for county law 20enforcement and fund the production of materials to educate 21drivers on construction zone safe driving habits and 22approaching stationary authorized emergency vehicles. 23    (k) In addition to other penalties imposed by this 24Section, the court may order a person convicted of a violation 25of subsection (c), (c-5), or (c-10), to perform community 26service as determined by the court.   SB1922 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 08405 LNS 18456 b1(Source: P.A. 102-336, eff. 1-1-22; 102-338, eff. 1-1-22; 2102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-667, eff. 1-1-25; 103-711, eff. 31-1-25; revised 11-26-24.)